Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.040

Merit systems.

Provisions for a merit system, made by charter or ordinance of a code city, shall be in compliance with any applicable statutes relating to civil service for employees of such city: PROVIDED, That nothing herein shall impair the validity of charter provisions adopted prior to the effective date of this title and relating to a merit system.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.040.]